test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-4lex_4uhcad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adaluuvčâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: adaluš
    áštáluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áštáluuvčâm
    čulgâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: falâluš
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hastâluuvčâm
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hastâluš
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posoluuvčâm
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posolâš
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárččuluuvčâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárččuluš
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäddáluuvčâm
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäddáluš
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzáluuvčâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vázzáluš
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhâluuvčâm
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luhâluš
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâluuvčâm
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cummâluš
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačâluuvčâm
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pačâluš

  Verb - posâluhčâđ: #     
    posâluhčâđ+V+Inf: posâluhčâđ
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâluuvčâm
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: posâluuvčah
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâluš
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: posâluhčeen
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: posâluhčvettee
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: posâluhčâv
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: posâluhčâp
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: posâluhčvetteđ
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: posâluhčeh
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: posâluhčim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: posâluhčih
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: posâluuvčâi
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: posâluvččáim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: posâluvččáid
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: posâluvččáin
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: posâluuvčâim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: posâluuvčâid
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: posâluhčii
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: posâluš
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: posâluhčim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: posâluuvčâi
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: posâluhčii
    posâluhčâđ+V+PrfPrc: posâluhčâm
    posâluhčâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: posâluhčum
    posâluhčâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: posâluhčum
